District of Columbia statutes.
13-422

Personal jurisdiction based upon enduring relationship.

A District of Columbia court may exercise personal jurisdiction over a person domiciled in, organized under the laws of, or maintaining his or its principal place of business in, the District of Columbia as to any claim for relief.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 549, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 132(a)
1981 Ed., § 13-422.
1973 Ed., § 13-422.